en: E284, Boric acid, Boracic acid, Orthoboric acid
xx: E284
bg: E284, Борна киселина, Борна киселина, ортоборна киселина
ca: E284, Àcid bòric, acid boric
cs: E284, Kyselina boritá, Kyselina orthoboritá, E 284, Kyselina trihydorenboritá, H3BO3, Borová voda
da: E284, Borsyre, Orthoborsyre, Boric acid
de: E284, Borsäure, Borsäure, Orthoborsäure, Borsäuretitration, Trihydrogenborat, Borhydroxid, Borwasser, E 284, H3BO3
el: E284, Βορικο οξυ, Βορακικό οξύ, ορθοβορικό οξύ
es: E284, Ácido bórico, Ácido borácico, Conservante E284, Ácido (orto)borico, Acido ortoborico, Conservante E 284
et: E284, Boorhape
fi: E284, Boorihappo, Ortoboorihappo, H3BO3, Boorihappoa, Ortoboorihappoa
fr: E284, Acide borique, Acide monoborique, acide orthoborique, Alcool boriqué, Acide boracique, 10043-35-3, Borate d'hydrogène, H3BO3
hu: E284, Bórsav, Bórsav, orto-Bórsav
it: E284, Acido borico, Acido boracico, acido ortoborico, Acido triossoborico, H3BO3, Acqua borica, Acido triossoborico(III)
lt: E284, Boro rūgštis, Boro rūgštis, ortoboro rūgštis, B(OH)3, H3BO3
lv: E284, Borskābe, Borakskābe, ortoborskābe
mt: E284, Aċidu boriku, Aċidu boraċiku, Aċidu ortoboriku
nl: E284, Boorzuur, Monoboorzuur, orthoboorzuur, H3BO3
pl: E284, Kwas borowy, Kwas borny, kwas ortoborowy
pt: E284, Ácido bórico, Ácido ortobórico, Ortoborato de hidrogênio
ro: E284, Acid boric, Acid boracic, Acid ortoboric, Hidroxid de bor
sk: E284, Kyselina boritá, Kyselina boracitová, Kyselina ortoboritá
sl: E284, Borova kislina, borova kislina, ortoborova kislina
sv: E284, Borsyra, Ortoborsyra, Boraxsyra, Borater, E 284, Borat

en: E285, Sodium tetraborate (borax), borax, sodium borate, sodium tetraborate, disodium tetraborate
xx: E285
bg: E285, Натриев тетраборат (боракс)
ca: E285, Tetraborat de sodi, bòrax, borax
cs: E285, Tetraboritan sodný (borax), Borax
da: E285, Natriumtetraborat (boraks), Boraks
de: E285, Natriumtetraborat (borax), Natriumtetraborat, wasserfreies Borax, Na2B4O7
el: E285, Τετραβορικο νατριο (βορακασ), Βόρακας
es: E285, Tetraborato sódico (bórax), bórax
et: E285, Naatriumtetraboraat, Naatriumboraat, Booraks
fi: E285, Natriumtetraboraatti (booraksi), Booraksi, Booraksia
fr: E285, Tétraborate de sodium, borax, Tétraborate de sodium (borax)
hu: E285, Nátrium-tetraborát (bórax), Bórax
it: E285, Tetraborato di sodio (borace), borace
lt: E285, Natrio tetraboratas (boraksas), Boraksas
lv: E285, Nātrija tetraborāts (boraks)
mt: E285, Tetraborat tas-sodju (borax)
nl: E285, Natriumtetraboraat (borax), Natriumtetraboraat
pl: E285, Czteroboran sodu (boraks), Boraks rodzimy
pt: E285, Tetraborato de sódio (bórax), Bórax
ro: E285, Tetraborat de sodiu (borax), Borax
sk: E285, Tetraboritan sodný (borax)
sl: E285, Natrijev tetraborat (boraks)
sv: E285, Natriumtetraborat (borax), Borax

en: E290, Carbon dioxide, Carbonic acid gas
xx: E290
af: E290, Koolstofdioksied
am: E290, ካርቦን ክልቶኦክሳይድ
an: E290, Dioxido de carbonio
ar: E290, ثنائي أكسيد الكربون
be: E290, Дыяксід вугляроду
bg: E290, Въглероден диоксид, Газ на въглена киселина
bn: E290, কার্বন ডাই অক্সাইড
bo: E290, དབྱང་གཉིས་སོལ་འགྱུར།
bs: E290, Ugljik-dioksid
ca: E290, Diòxid de carboni, dioxid de carboni
cs: E290, Oxid uhličitý, Plynný oxid uhličitý
cy: E290, carbon deuocsid
da: E290, Carbondioxid, Kuldioxidgas, Kuldioxid
de: E290, Kohlendioxid, Kohlenstoffdioxid
el: E290, Διοξειδιο του ανθρακα, Αέριο ανθρακικό οξύ
eo: E290, karbona dioksido
es: E290, Dióxido de carbono, Anhídrido carbónico, Gas de ácido carbónico
et: E290, Süsinikdioksiid, süsihappegaas
fa: E290, کربن دی‌اکسید
fi: E290, Hiilidioksidi, Hiilidioksidia
fr: E290, Dioxyde de carbone, Anhydride carbonique, gaz carbonique, carbonate d'hydrogène, Gaz de l'acide carbonique, neige carbonique, gaz carbonique naturel, CO², CO2
ga: E290, Dé-ocsaíd charbóin
gd: E290, Dà-ogsaid gualain
gl: E290, Dióxido de carbono
gv: E290, Daa-ocseed charboan
he: E290, פחמן דו-חמצני
hi: E290, कार्बन डाईऑक्साइड
hr: E290, Ugljikov oksid, ugljikov dioksid, ugljični dioksid, CO₂, co2
ht: E290, Dyoksid kabòn
hu: E290, Szén-dioxid
hy: E290, ածխաթթու գազ
ia: E290, Anhydrido carbonic
id: E290, Karbon dioksida
io: E290, Karbo dioxido
is: E290, Koltvísýringur
it: E290, Anidride carbonica, Gas acido carbonico, biossido di carbonio, diossido di carbonio
ja: E290, 二酸化炭素, 炭酸ガス
jv: E290, Karbon dioksida
ka: E290, ნახშირორჟანგი
kk: E290, Көмірқышқыл газ
kn: E290, ಇಂಗಾಲದ ಡೈಆಕ್ಸೈಡ್
ko: E290, 이산화 탄소
ku: E290, Karbona dioksîd
la: E290, Carbonii dioxidum
lb: E290, Kuelendioxid
li: E290, Kooldioxide
lt: E290, Anglies dioksidas, Angliarūgštė
lv: E290, Oglekļa dioksīds, Ogļskābā gāze
mk: E290, Јаглерод диоксид
ml: E290, കാർബൺ ഡയോക്സൈഡ്
mr: E290, कार्बन डायॉक्साइड
ms: E290, Karbon dioksida
mt: E290, Diossidu tal-karbonju, Gass tal-aċidu karboniku
my: E290, ကာဗွန်ဒိုင်အောက်ဆိုက်
nb: E290, karbondioksid, kullsyre
ne: E290, कार्बनडाइअक्साइड
nl: E290, Koolstofdioxide, Koolzuurgas, kooldioxide
nn: E290, karbondioksid
oc: E290, Dioxid de carbòni
om: E290, Carbon dioxide
or: E290, ଅଙ୍ଗାରକାମ୍ଳ
pa: E290, ਕਾਰਬਨ ਡਾਈਆਕਸਾਈਡ
pl: E290, Dwutlenek węgla, Gazowy dwutlenek węgla, ditlenek węgla
ps: E290, کـاربن ډای اکسايد
pt: E290, Dióxido de carbono, Gás carbónico
qu: E290, Chimlasay
ro: E290, Dioxid de carbon, Gaz de acid carbonic
ru: E290, оксид углерода
sc: E290, Diòssidu de carboniu
sh: E290, Ugljen-dioksid
si: E290, කාබන්ඩයොක්සයිඩ්
sk: E290, Oxid uhličitý, Plyn kyseliny uhličitej
sl: E290, Ogljikov dioksid, carbonic acid gas
so: E290, Kaarboon laba ogsaydh
sq: E290, Dioksidi i karbonit
sr: E290, ugljen-dioksid
su: E290, Karbon dioksida
sv: E290, Koldioxid, Kolsyregas, kolsyresnö
ta: E290, காபனீரொக்சைட்டு
te: E290, కార్బన్ డయాక్సైడ్
th: E290, คาร์บอนไดออกไซด์
tl: E290, Karbon dioksido
tr: E290, Karbondioksit
uk: E290, Діоксид вуглецю
ur: E290, کاربن دو اکسید
uz: E290, Karbonat angidrid
vi: E290, Cacbon điôxít
wa: E290, Diyocside di carbone
yi: E290, קוילן זייערס
yo: E290, Kárbónì ọlọ́ksíjínìméjì
za: E290, Ngeihyangjvaqdanq
zh: E290, 二氧化碳

en: E296, Malic acid, hydroxybutanedioic acid, l-malic acid
xx: E296
ar: E296, حمض التفاح
az: E296, Alma turşusu
be: E296, Яблычная кіслата
bg: E296, Ябълчна киселина, Ябълчена киселина, Хидроксиянтарна киселина
ca: E296, Àcid màlic, acid malic
cs: E296, Kyselina jablečná, Kyselina hydroxybutandiová, kyselina hydroxyjantarová, Malát
da: E296, Æblesyre, Malinsyre, Malat
de: E296, Äpfelsäure, Aepfelsäure, Apfelsäure, 2-Hydroxybutan-1.4-disäure, Malat, 2-Hydroxybutandisäure, Hydroxybutandisäure, 2-Hydroxybernsteinsäure, Malate, Hydroxybernsteinsäure, 2-Hydroxyethan-1., 2-dicarbonsäure
el: E296, Μηλικο οξυ
eo: E296, Pomacido
es: E296, Ácido málico
et: E296, Õunhape
eu: E296, azido maliko
fa: E296, مالیک اسید
fi: E296, Omenahappo, Hydroksibutaanidihappo, Omenahappoa, Hydroksibutaanidihappoa
fr: E296, Acide malique, Malic Acid, Malate
ga: E296, Aigéad malach
he: E296, חומצה מאלית
hi: E296, मैलिक अम्ल
hr: E296, jabučna, jabučna kiselina
hu: E296, Almasav
hy: E296, Խնձորաթթու
id: E296, asam malat
it: E296, Acido malico, Malato, Acido 2S-idrossi-1.4-butandioico, Acido fruttico, Acido di mela, Acido L-(-)-idrossisuccinico
ja: E296, リンゴ酸
jv: E296, Asam malat
kk: E296, Алма қышқылы
ko: E296, 말산
lt: E296, Obuolių rūgštis
lv: E296, Ābolskābe, Malāti
mk: E296, Јаболкова киселина
mt: E296, Aċidu maliku
nb: E296, Eplesyre
nl: E296, Appelzuur
nn: E296, eplesyre
pl: E296, Kwas jabłkowy, Kwas hydroksybutanodiowy, Jabłczan, Kwas hydroksybursztynowy
pt: E296, Ácido málico, Ácido hidroxisuccínico
ro: E296, Acid malic
ru: E296, яблочная кислота
sh: E296, Malinska kiselina
sk: E296, Kyselina jablčná
sl: E296, Jabolčna kislina
sr: E296, Malinska kiselina
sv: E296, Äppelsyra, Malat, Äpplesyra
ta: E296, மேலிக் அமிலம்
th: E296, กรดมาลิก
tr: E296, Malik asit
uk: E296, Яблучна кислота
vi: E296, Axit malic
zh: E296, 苹果酸

en: E297, Fumaric acid, trans-Butenedioic acid
xx: E297
bg: E297, Фурмарова киселина, транс-бутендиова киселина
ca: E297, Àcid fumàric, acid fumaric
cs: E297, Kyselina fumarová, Kyselina (E)-butendiová
da: E297, Fumarsyre, trans-Butendisyre
de: E297, Fumarsäure, trans-Butendisäure
el: E297, Φουμαρικο οξυ, trans-Βουτενοδικαρβονικό οξύ
es: E297, Ácido fumárico, Ácido trans-butenodioico
et: E297, Fumaarhape, trans-buteendihape
fi: E297, Fumaarihappo, trans-Buteenidikarbonihappo, Fumaarihappoa, trans-Buteenidikarbonihappoa
fr: E297, Acide fumarique, Acide trans-butène-dioïque
hr: E297, fumarna kiselina
hu: E297, Fumársav, transz-Buténdisav
it: E297, Acido fumarico, Acido trans-butenedioico
lt: E297, Fumaro rūgštis, Transbuteno dirūgštis
lv: E297, Fumārskābe, Trans-butāndiskābe, trans-1
mt: E297, Aċidu fumariku, Aċidu trans-Butendiojku
nl: E297, Fumaarzuur, trans-Buteendizuur
pl: E297, Kwas fumarowy, Kwas trans-butenediowy
pt: E297, Ácido fumárico, Ácido trans-butenodióico
ro: E297, Acid fumaric, Acid trans-butendioic
sk: E297, Kyselina fumarová, Kyselina trans-buténdiová
sl: E297, Fumarna kislina, trans-butendiojska kislina
sv: E297, Fumarsyra, trans-Butendisyra

en: E300, Ascorbic acid, l-ascorbic acid, Synonyms L-xylo-Ascorbic acid
xx: E300, 3a300
bg: E300, Аскорбинова киселина, l-аскорбинова киселина, L-ксило-аскорбинова киселина
ca: E300, Àcid ascòrbic, acid ascorbic
cs: E300, Kyselina askorbová, kyselina l-askorbová
da: E300, Ascorbinsyre, L-askorbinsyre, Askorbinsyre, L-ascorbinsyre, Ascorbat, Askorbat
de: E300, Ascorbinsäure, Askorbinsäure, L-Ascorbinsäure
el: E300, Ασκορβικο οξυ, l-ασκορβικο οξυ
es: E300, Ácido ascórbico, Ácido l-ascórbico, Ácido L-ascórbico
et: E300, Askorbiinhape
fi: E300, Askorbiinihappo, L-askorbiinihappo, Askorbiinihappoa, L-askorbiinihappoa
fr: E300, Acide ascorbique, Acide L-ascorbique, Acide ascorbique (L-), Acide L(+)-ascorbique, Ascorbate
hr: E300, askorbinska kiselina, l-askorbinska kiselina, askrobinska kiselina, askorbinska
hu: E300, Aszkorbinsav, l-aszkorbinsav
it: E300, Acido ascorbico, acido l-ascorbico, Ascorbato
lt: E300, Askorbo rūgštis, l-askorbo rūgštis, Askorbinas
lv: E300, Askorbīnskābe, l-askorbīnskābe
mt: E300, Aċidu askorbiku, aċidu l-askorbiku
nb: E300, Askorbinsyre, L-Askorbinsyre
nl: E300, Ascorbinezuur
pl: E300, Kwas askorbinowy, kwas l-askorbinowy, kwas askorbowy
pt: E300, Ácido ascórbico, ácido l-ascórbico, Ascorbato
ro: E300, Acid ascorbic, acid l-ascorbic
ru: E300, Аскорбиновая кислота, Аскорбат, Асковит, Асвитол, Цитравит, Аскорбинка
sk: E300, Kyselina askorbová, kyselina l-askorbová
sl: E300, Askorbinska kislina, l-askorbinska kislina
sv: E300, Askorbinsyra, l-askorbinsyra, Hexuronsyra, Askorbat, Askobinsyror, Askorbin

en: E301, Sodium ascorbate, Sodium L-ascorbate
xx: E301
bg: E301, Натриев аскорбат, Натриев L-аскорбат
ca: E301, Ascorbat de sodi, ascorbat sòdic
cs: E301, Askorban sodný, L-askorban sodný
da: E301, Natriumascorbat, Natrium-L-ascorbat
de: E301, Natriumascorbat, E 301, Natrium-L-Ascorbat
el: E301, Ασκορβικο νατριο, L-Ασκορβικό νάτριο
eo: E301, Natria askorbato
es: E301, Ascorbato sódico, Ascorbato de sodio, L-ascorbato sódico, E 301, L-ascorbato de sódio
et: E301, Naatriumaskorbaat
fa: E301, اسکوربات سدیم
fi: E301, Natriumaskorbaatti, Natrium-L-Askorbaatti, Natriumaskorbaattia, Natrium-L-Askorbaattia
fr: E301, Ascorbate de sodium, Ascorbate de sodium, L-ascorbate de sodium, sel monosodique de l’acide L-ascorbique, L-ascorbate de Sodium, 134-03-2, C6H7O6Na
hr: E301, natrijev askorbat, antioksidans E301
hu: E301, Nátrium-aszkorbát, Nátrium-L-aszkorbát
hy: E301, Նատրիումի ասկորբատ
it: E301, Ascorbato di sodio, L-Ascorbato di sodio
lt: E301, Natrio askorbatas, Natrio L-askorbatas, Mononatrio askorbatas
lv: E301, Nātrija askorbāts, Nātrija L-askorbāts
mt: E301, Askorbat tas-sodju, L-askorbat tas-sodju
nb: E301, Natriumaskorbat
nl: E301, Natriumascorbaat, Natrium-L-ascorbaat
pl: E301, Askorbinian sodu, L-askorbinian sodu
pt: E301, Ascorbato de sódio, L-Ascorbato de sódio
ro: E301, Ascorbat de sodiu, L-ascorbat de sodiu
ru: E301, Аскорбат натрия, Е301
sh: E301, Natrijum askorbat
sk: E301, Askorban sodný, L-askorbát sodný
sl: E301, Natrijev askorbat, natrijev L-askorbat
sr: E301, Natrijum askorbat
sv: E301, Natriumaskorbat, Natrium-L-askorbat
tr: E301, Sodyum askorbat, Askorbin, Askorbik asidin sodyum tuzu
uk: E301, Аскорбат натрію

en: E302, Calcium ascorbate
xx: E302
bg: E302, Калциев аскорбат
ca: E302, Ascorbat de calci
cs: E302, Askorban vápenatý, Askorban vápenatý
da: E302, Calciumascorbat
de: E302, Calciumascorbat
el: E302, Ασκορβικο ασβεστιο
es: E302, Ascorbato cálcico, Ascorbato de calcio
et: E302, Kaltsiumaskorbaat
fi: E302, Kalsiumaskorbaatti, Kalsiumaskorbaattia
fr: E302, Ascorbate de calcium, Ascorbate de calcium (Vitamine C)
hu: E302, Kalcium-aszkorbát
it: E302, Ascorbato di calcio
lt: E302, Kalcio askorbatas
lv: E302, Kalcija askorbāts
mt: E302, Askorbat tal-kalċju
nl: E302, Calciumascorbaat
pl: E302, Askorbinian wapnia
pt: E302, Ascorbato de cálcio
ro: E302, Ascorbat de calciu
sk: E302, Askorban vápenatý
sl: E302, Kalcijev askorbat
sv: E302, Kalciumaskorbat

en: E303, Potassium ascorbate
xx: E303
ar: E303, أسكوربات البوتاسيوم
az: E303, Kalium askorbat
bg: E303, Калиев аскорбат
ca: E303, Ascorbat de potassi
cs: E303, Askorbát draselný
da: E303, Kaliumascorbat
de: E303, Kaliumascorbat
el: E303, Ασκορβικό κάλιο
es: E303, Ascorbato de potasio, Ascorbato potásico, E 303
et: E303, Kaaliumaskorbaat
fi: E303, Kaliumaskorbaatti, Kaliumaskorbaattia
fr: E303, Diacétate d'ascorbyle
hu: E303, Kálium-aszkorbát
it: E303, Ascorbato di potassio, KC6H7O6
ja: E303, アスコルビン酸カリウム
ko: E303, 아스코르브산 칼륨
lt: E303, Kalio askorbatas, Monokalio askorbatas
lv: E303, Kālija askorbāts
nl: E303, Kaliumascorbaat
pl: E303, Askorbinian potasu
pt: E303, Ascorbato de potássio
ro: E303, Ascorbat de potasiu
ru: E303, Аскорбат калия
sk: E303, Askorbát draselný
sl: E303, Kalijev askorbat
sv: E303, Kaliumaskorbat
tr: E303, Potasyum askorbat
uk: E303, Аскорбат калію
zh: E303, 抗坏血酸钾

en: E304, Fatty acid esters of ascorbic acid, ascorbic acid esters of fatty acid
xx: E304
ar: إسترات الأحماض الدهنية لحمض الأسكوربيك
az: Askorbin turşusunun yağ turşusu esterləri
bg: Мастнокиселинни естери на аскорбиновата киселина
ca: Èster d'àcids grassos d'àcid ascòrbic
cs: Estery mastných kyselin kyseliny askorbové
da: Fedtsyreestere af ascorbinsyre
de: Fettsäureester der Ascorbinsäure, Palmitinsäureascorbylester
el: Εστέρες λιπαρών οξέων του ασκορβικού οξέος
es: ésteres de ácidos grasos del ácido ascórbico
et: Askorbiinhappe rasvhappeestrid
eu: Azido askorbikoaren gantz-azidoen esterrak
fa: استرهای اسید چرب اسید آسکوربیک
fi: askorbiinihapon rasvahappoesterit
fr: Acide palmityle-6-L-ascorbique, esters d'acides gras de l'acide ascorbique
ga: ইস্টেরí aicídí sailleacha d'aigéad ascorbic
he: אסטרים של חומצות שומן של חומצה אסקורבית
hr: esteri masnih kiselina askorbinske kiseline
hu: Aszkorbil-palmitát zsírsavészeteri
id: Ester asam lemak asam askorbat
it: esteri dell'acido ascorbico con acidi grassi
ja: アスコルビン酸脂肪酸エステル
ko: 아스코르브산의 지방산 에스테르
lt: Askorbo rūgšties riebalų rūgščių esteriai
lv: Askorbīnskābes taukskābju esteri
mk: Естри на масни киселини на аскорбинска киселина
mt: Esteri ta' aċidi grassi ta' aċidu askorbiku
nl: vetzuuresters van ascorbinezuur
pl: Estry kwasów tłuszczowych i kwasu askorbinowego
pt: Ésteres de ácidos gordos do ácido ascórbico
ro: Esteri ai acizilor grași ai acidului ascorbic
ru: Эфиры жирных кислот аскорбиновой кислоты
sk: Estery mastných kyselín kyseliny askorbovej
sl: Estri maščobnih kislin askorbinske kisline
sr: Естри масних киселина аскорбинске киселине
sv: fettsyraestrar av askorbinsyra, askorbinsyraestrar av fettsyror
th: เอสเทอร์ของกรดไขมันของกรดแอสคอร์บิก
tr: Askorbik asidin yağ asidi esterleri
uk: Ефіри жирних кислот аскорбінової кислоти
zh: 抗坏血酸的脂肪酸酯

en: E304(i), Ascorbyl palmitate, L-Ascorbyl Palmitate
xx: E304(i)
ar: E304(i), بالميتات الأسكوربيل
bg: E304(i), Аскорбил палмитат
ca: E304(i), Palmitat d'ascorbil
cs: E304(i), Askorbylpalmitát
da: E304(i), Ascorbylpalmitat
de: E304(i), Ascorbylpalmitat
el: E304(i), Παλμιτικο ασκορβυλιο
es: E304(i), Palmitato ascorbilo, Palmitato de ascorbilo
et: E304(i), Askorbüülpalmitaat
fi: E304(i), Askorbyylipalmitaatti, Askorbyylipalmitaattia
fr: E304(i), Palmitate d'ascorbyle, Palmitate de L-ascorbyle
hu: E304(i), Aszkorbil-palmitát
it: E304(i), Palmitato di ascorbile
ja: E304(i), パルミチン酸アスコルビル
lt: E304(i), Askorbilpalmitatas
lv: E304(i), Askorbilpalmitāts
mt: E304(i), Palmitat askorbili
nl: E304(i), Ascorbylpalmitaat
pl: E304(i), Palmitynian askorbylu
pt: E304(i), Palmitato de ascorbilo
ro: E304(i), Palmitat de ascorbil
sh: E304(i), Askorbil palmitat
sk: E304(i), Askorbyl-palmitan
sl: E304(i), Askorbil palmitat
sr: E304(i), Askorbil palmitat
sv: E304(i), Askorbylpalmitat

en: E304(ii), Ascorbyl stearate, E305
xx: E304(ii)
bg: E304(ii), Аскорбил стеарат
cs: E304(ii), Askorbylstearát
da: E304(ii), Ascorbylstearat
de: E304(ii), Ascorbylstearat
el: E304(ii), Στεατικο ασκορβυλιο
es: E304(ii), Estearato de ascorbilo
et: E304(ii), Askorbüülstearaat
fi: E304(ii), Askorbyylistearaatti, Askorbyylistearaattia
fr: E304(ii), Stéarate d'ascorbyle
hu: E304(ii), Aszkorbil-sztearát
it: E304(ii), Stearato di ascorbile
lt: E304(ii), Askorbilstearatas
lv: E304(ii), Askorbilstearāts
mt: E304(ii), Stearat askorbili, Stearat askorbili, Stearat L-askorbili
nl: E304(ii), Ascorbylstearaat
pl: E304(ii), Stearynian askorbylu
pt: E304(ii), Estearato de ascorbilo
ro: E304(ii), Stearat de ascorbil
sk: E304(ii), Askorbylstearan
sl: E304(ii), Askorbil stearat
sv: E304(ii), Askorbylstearat

en: E306, Tocopherol-rich extract, Tocopherols, natural tocopherols, mixed tocopherols, natural mixed tocopherols
xx: E306, 1b306i, 1b306ii, 1b306
bg: E306, Токоферол-обогатен екстракт
ca: E306, Extracte ric en tocoferols
cs: E306, Extrakt s vysokým obsahem tokoferolů
da: E306, Tocopherolrig ekstrakt
de: E306, Stark tocopherolhaltige Extrakte, Tocopherol-haltige Extrakte, stark tocopherolhaltiger Extrakt
el: E306, Εκχυλισμα πλουσιο σε τοκοφερολες
es: E306, Extracto rico en tocoferoles, Extracto rico en tocoferol, mezcla de tocoferoles
et: E306, Tokoferoolikontsentraat
fi: E306, Tokoferoliuute, Tokoferoliuutetta
fr: E306, Extrait riche en tocophérols, extraits riches en tocophérol, Extraits riches en tocophérols, extraits d'origine naturelle riches en tocophérols, mélange de tocophérols
hr: E306, ekstrakt bogat tokoferolima, mješavina antioksidanta iz prirodnih tokoferola, mješavina tokoferola obogaćena
hu: E306, Tokoferolban gazdag kivonat, tokoferolok, természetes tokoferolok, vegyes tokoferolok
it: E306, Estratto ricco in tocoferolo, estratto ricco in tocoferoli, estratto ricco di tocoferolo, estratto ricco di tocoferoli
lt: E306, Tokoferolių koncentruotas ekstraktas
lv: E306, Tokoferola ekstrakts
mt: E306, Esratt rikk fit-tokoferol
nl: E306, Tocoferolrijk extract, tocoferolrijke extract
pl: E306, Mieszanina tokoferoli
pt: E306, Extracto rico em tocoferóis
ro: E306, Extract bogat în tocoferol
ru: E306, концентрат смеси токоферолов, концентрат смеси
sk: E306, Extrakt s vysokým obsahom tokoferolu
sl: E306, Izvleček, bogat s tokoferolom
sv: E306, Tokoferolrika extrakt, Tocopherol-extrakt

en: E307a, D-Alpha-tocopherol
xx: E307a
bg: E307a, D-Alpha-токоферол
cs: E307a, D-Alpha-tokoferol
da: E307a, D-Alpha-tocopherol
de: E307a, D-Alpha-Tocopherol, D-α-Tocopherol
el: E307a, D-Alpha-τοκοφερόλη
es: E307a, D-Alpha-tocoferol
et: E307a, D-Alpha-tokoferool
fi: E307a, D-Alfa-tokoferoli, D-Alfa-tokoferolia, D-Alpha-tokoferoli
fr: E307a, D-alpha-tocophérol
hu: E307a, D-Alpha-tokoferol
it: E307a, D-Alpha-tocoferolo
lt: E307a, D-Alpha-tokoferolis
lv: E307a, D-Alpha-tokoferols
mt: E307a, D-Alpha-tokoferol
nl: E307a, D-Alpha-tocoferol
pl: E307a, D-Alpha-tokoferol
pt: E307a, D-Alpha-tocoferol
ro: E307a, D-Alpha-tocoferol
sk: E307a, D-Alpha-tokoferol
sl: E307a, D-Alpha-tokoferol
sv: E307a, D-Alpha-tokoferol

en: E307b, concentrated tocopherol
xx: E307b
bg: E307b, концентриран токоферол
cs: E307b, koncentrovaný tokoferol
da: E307b, koncentreret tocopherol
de: E307b, konzentrierter Tocopherol
el: E307b, συμπυκνωμένο τοκοφερόλη
es: E307b, tocoferol concentrado
et: E307b, kontsentreeritud tokoferool
fi: E307b, tiivistetty tokoferoli
fr: E307b, tocophérol concentré
hu: E307b, koncentrált tokoferol
it: E307b, tocoferolo concentrato
lt: E307b, koncentruotas tokoferolis
lv: E307b, koncentrēts tokoferols
mt: E307b, tokoferol konċentrat
nl: E307b, geconcentreerde tocoferol
pl: E307b, skoncentrowany tokoferol
pt: E307b, tocoferol concentrado
ro: E307b, tocoferol concentrat, concentrat de tocoferol
sk: E307b, koncentrovaný tokoferol
sl: E307b, koncentriran tokoferol
sv: E307b, koncentrerad tokoferol

en: E307c, DL-Alpha-tocopherol
xx: E307c
bg: E307c, dl-α-токоферол
cs: E307c, DL-α-tokoferol
da: E307c, dl-α-Tocopherol
de: E307c, DL-Alpha-Tocopherol, DL-α-Tocopherol
el: E307c, dl-α-Τοκοφερόλη
es: E307c, DL-α-tocoferol
et: E307c, DL-alfa-tokoferool
fi: E307c, DL-Alfa-tokoferoli, DL-Alfa-tokoferolia
fr: E307c, DL-alpha-Tocophérol, dl-α-Tocophérol
hr: E307c, DL-a-tokoferol acetat
hu: E307c, DL-alfa-tokoferol, DL-α-Tokoferol
it: E307c, DL-alfa-Tocoferolo, DL-α-Tocoferolo
lt: E307c, dl-α-tokoferolis
lv: E307c, dl-α-tokoferols
mt: E307c, dl-α-Tokoferol
nl: E307c, dl-α-Tocoferol
nn: E307c
pl: E307c, dl-α-tokoferol
pt: E307c, dl-α-Tocoferol
ro: E307c, DL-alfa-tocoferol, dl-α-tocoferol
sk: E307c, DL-α-tokoferol
sl: E307c, dl alfa tokoferol
sr: E307c
sv: E307c, DL-α-Tokoferol

en: E308, Gamme-tocopherol, gamma-Tocopherol
xx: E308
ar: إي 308، غاما توكوفيرول
az: E308, Gamma-tokoferol
bg: E308, Гама-токоферол
ca: E308, γ-tocoferol
cs: E308, Gamma-tokoferol
da: E308, Gamma-tocopherol
de: E308, Gamma-Tocopherol, γ-Tocopherol
el: E308, Γάμμα-τοκοφερόλη
es: E308, Gamma-tocoferol
et: E308, Gamma-tokopherol
fi: E308, Gamma-tokoferoli, Gamma-tokoferolia
fr: E308, Gamma-tocophérol de synthèse, Gamma-tocophérol, 54-28-4
hu: E308, gamma-tokoferol
id: E308, Gamma-tokoferol
it: E308, Gamma-tocoferolo
ja: E308, ガンマ - トコフェロール
ko: E308, 감마 - 토코페롤
lt: E308, Gama-tokoferolis
lv: E308, Gamma-tokoferols
mt: E308, Gamma-tokoferol
nl: E308, gamma-Tocopherol
pl: E308, γ-Tokoferol, Gamma-tokoferol
pt: E308, Gama-tocoferol
ro: E308, Gamma-tocoferol
ru: E308, Гамма-токоферол
sk: E308, Gama-tokoferol
sl: E308, Gama-tokoferol
sv: E308, Gamma-tokoferol
th: E308, แกมมา - โทโคฟีรอล
tr: E308, Gama-tokoferol
uk: E308, Гамма-токоферол
zh: E308, γ-生育酚

en: E309, Delta-tocopherol, δ-tocopherol
xx: E309
ar: إي 309، دلتا توكوفيرول
az: E309, Delta-tokoferol
bg: E309, Делта-токоферол
ca: E309, δ-tocoferol
cs: E309, Delta-tokoferol
da: E309, Delta-tocopherol
de: E309, Delta-Tocopherol, δ-Tocopherol
el: E309, Δέλτα-τοκοφερόλη
es: E309, Delta-tocoferol
et: E309, Delta-tokopherol
fi: E309, Delta-tokoferoli, Delta-tokoferolia
fr: E309, Delta-tocophérol de synthèse, δ-tocophérol, 119-13-1, delta-tocophérol
hu: E309, delta-tokoferol
id: E309, Delta-tokoferol
it: E309, delta-tocoferolo
ja: E309, デルタ-トコフェロール
ko: E309, 델타-토코페롤
lt: E309, delta-tokoferolis
lv: E309, delta-tokoferols
mt: E309, delta-Tokoferol
nl: E309, delta-tocoferol
pl: E309, delta-tokoferol
pt: E309, delta-tocoferol
ro: E309, delta-tocoferol
ru: E309, Дельта-токоферол
sk: E309, delta-tokoferol
sl: E309, delta-tokoferol
sv: E309, delta-tokoferol
th: E309, เดลตา-โทโคฟีรอล
tr: E309, Delta-tokoferol
uk: E309, Дельта-токоферол
zh: E309, δ-生育酚

en: E307, Alpha-tocopherol
xx: E307
bg: E307, Алфа-токоферол
ca: E307, α-tocoferol
cs: E307, Alfa-tokoferol
da: E307, Alfa-tocopherol
de: E307, Alpha-Tocopherol
el: E307, Α-τοκοφερολη
es: E307, Alfa-tocoferol, Tocoferol alfa, Α-Tocoferol, tocoferoles, Vitamina E(sintética)
et: E307, Alfa-tokoferool, dl-α-tokoferool
fi: E307, Alfatokoferoli, Alfa-tokoferoli, Alfatokoferolia, Alfa-tokoferolia
fr: E307, Alphatocophérol, Alpha-tocophérol, Alpha-tocophérol de synthèse
hr: E307, alfa-tokoferol, antioksidans alfa-tokoferol
hu: E307, Alfa-tokoferol
it: E307, Alfa-tocoferolo
lt: E307, Alfa tokoferolis
lv: E307, Alfa-tokoferols
mt: E307, Alfa-tokoferol
nl: E307, Alfa-tocoferol
pl: E307, Alfa-tokoferol
pt: E307, Alfa-tocoferol
ro: E307, Alfa-tocoferol
sk: E307, Alfa-tokoferol
sl: E307, Alfa tokoferol
sv: E307, Alfa-tokoferol

en: E310, Propyl gallate, Propyl gallate, Propyl ester of gallic acid
xx: E310
bg: E310, Пропил галат
ca: E310, Gal·lat de propil
cs: E310, Propylgallát, Propylgallát, propylester kyseliny gallové
da: E310, Propylgallat, Propylgallat, propylester af gallusgarvesyre
de: E310, Propylgallat, Propylgallat, Propylester der Gallussäure
el: E310, Γαλλικος προπυλεστερας, Γαλλικό προπύλιο, Γαλλικός προπυλεστέρας
es: E310, Galato de propilo
et: E310, Propüülgallaat, Propüülgallaat, gallushappe propüülester
fi: E310, Propyyligallaatti, Gallushapon propyyliesteri, Propyyligallaattia, Gallushapon propyyliesteriä
fr: E310, Gallate de propyle
hr: E310, propil galat
hu: E310, Propil-gallát, Propil-gallát, Galluszsav propil-észtere
it: E310, Gallato di propile, Propil gallato
lt: E310, Propilo galatas, Propilgalatas, galo rūgšties propilo esteris
lv: E310, Propilgallāts, Propilgallāts, Gallusskābes propilesteris
mt: E310, Gallat tal-propil
nl: E310, Propylgallaat, Propylgallaat, propylester van galluszuur
pl: E310, Galusan propylu
pt: E310, Galato de propilo
ro: E310, Galat de propil
sk: E310, Propylgalát, Propyl-galát, propylester kyseliny gálovej
sl: E310, Propil galat, propil galat, propilester galne kisline
sv: E310, Propylgallat, Propylgallat, gallussyrans propylester